Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1106
Unlawful employment practice for labor organization.

It shall be an unlawful employment practice for a labor organization:

(1) To exclude or to expel from its membership, or otherwise to discriminate against, any individual because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status;

(2) To limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or to classify or fail or refuse to refer for employment any individual, in any way which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment opportunities, or would limit such employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect such individual's status as an employee or as an applicant for employment, because of such individual's race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status; or

(3) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an individual in violation of this section.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 6, p. 785;

Laws 1973, LB 266, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 161, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 81.